California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(C) The Legislature further finds and declares that conclusively determining, no later than the deadline mandated under Section 25.5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, that the state’s obligation
 under subdivision (e) to fully repay any revenue reduction incurred by a local agency pursuant to subdivision (a) and all accrued interest thereon is a matter of vital and urgent public importance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 634, Sec. 8.   (SB 67)   Effective October 19, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

100.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2007–08 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, property tax assessed value attributable to unitary property, as defined in Section 723, of a regulated railway company that is assessed by the State Board of Equalization, shall be allocated to tax rate areas as follows:

(1) With respect to the value of a qualified facility, both of the following apply:

(A) An amount of value equal to 20 percent of the original cost of the qualified facility shall be allocated exclusively to those tax rate areas in the county in which the facility is located. The tax rates applied to this value shall be the rates described in Section 93.

(B) The revenues derived from the application of these rates to the value described in subparagraph (A) shall be allocated to jurisdictions in those tax rate areas in the county in which the qualified property is located in percentage shares that are equivalent to the percentage shares that these jurisdictions received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the regulated railway company in the county in which the qualified property is located. The county auditor shall ensure that school entities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95, in these tax rate areas in a county are allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage the school entities received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the regulated railway company in the county.

(2) With respect to the value of unitary property of a regulated railway company that is not described in paragraph (1), all of the following apply:

(A) A countywide tax rate area shall be established in each county in which the property of a regulated railway company is located. Value shall be allocated to that countywide tax rate area according to the following:

(i) Each countywide tax rate area shall receive an amount of assessed value equal to the amount of assessed value received in the county for the prior fiscal year, adjusted for changes in track mileage, unless the total amount of assessed value to be allocated is insufficient, in which case, each countywide tax rate area shall receive a pro rata share of the amount it received in the prior fiscal year, adjusted for changes in track mileage.

(ii) If the total amount of assessed value to be allocated is greater than the amount of assessed value allocated for the prior fiscal year, adjusted for changes in track mileage, each countywide tax rate area shall receive a pro rata share of the amount in excess of the prior year’s assessed value of the regulated railway company adjusted for track mileage.

(iii) The assessed value allocated to each countywide tax rate area under clauses (i) and (ii) shall be further allocated between land, improvements, and personal property in the same proportion that existed for each regulated railway company statewide for the 2006–07 assessment year.

(B) The tax rate applied to the value allocated to a countywide tax rate area under subparagraph (A) shall be the sum of the rates described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 100.

(C) The revenues derived from the application of these rates to this value shall be allocated in the manner described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 100, which manner shall be modified as follows:

(i) School entities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95, in a county shall be allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage the school entities received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the regulated railway company in the county.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2007–08 fiscal year, a redevelopment agency shall not receive any property tax revenues described in this paragraph.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Qualified facility” means a building, auto or container loading and unloading facility, or transload facility that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The original cost of the completed facility, including land, but not including, track and track materials, is equal to or exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(B) The facility is completely constructed and placed in service after January 1, 2007.

(2) “The amount of assessed value received in the prior fiscal year adjusted for changes in track mileage” means the prior year’s amount of assessed value in each county after it has been adjusted upward or downward in direct proportion to the change in the amount of track mileage on unitary property in the current year over the prior year.

(3) “Track mileage” means the number of total miles of track in a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 791, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

100.2.

Supplemental property tax revenues for 1985–86 and each year thereafter, generated by Sections 75 to 75.80, inclusive, shall be apportioned using the property tax apportionment factors for the current year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

100.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Santa Cruz, the auditor shall, for the 1993–94 fiscal year only, deposit those property tax revenues that would otherwise be allocated to enterprise special districts in a Supplemental Allocation Fund. The county board of supervisors shall allocate moneys in the fund for the 1993–94 fiscal year only to either enterprise special districts or the County Library Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.   See prevailing Section 100.3 (added by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1167) as amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 635.)
-------------------------------------------

100.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Santa Cruz, the auditor shall, for the 1997–98 and future fiscal years, upon the written mutual agreement of the county and an enterprise district, deposit those property tax revenues that would otherwise be allocated to that enterprise special district in a Supplemental Allocation Fund. The county board of supervisors shall allocate moneys in the fund to either enterprise special districts or the county’s parks and recreation special district listed as County Service Area Number 11 in the State Controller’s Annual Report of Financial Transactions concerning Special Districts of California, Fiscal Year 1994–95. A written mutual agreement as described in this section may terminate upon a specified date, on or after which all revenues that would be otherwise subject to that agreement shall instead be allocated to the enterprise special district, unless the term of the agreement is extended, or a new written mutual agreement is entered into by the county and the enterprise special district, prior to that specified date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 13) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

100.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocations and apportionments made in a County of the Eighteenth Class of revenues generated by Sections 75 to 75.80, inclusive, for fiscal years to the 1999–2000 fiscal year, inclusive, are deemed to be correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 611, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

100.6.

(a) For the 1989–90 and 1990–91 fiscal years, property tax revenue shall be allocated by the Sacramento County Auditor to special districts, as defined in subdivision (b), consistent with the holding of American River Fire Protection District v. Board of Supervisors (1989), 211 Cal. App. 3d 1076, and as implemented in American River Fire Protection District, et al. v. Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento, et al., Sacramento Superior Court Case No. 431637, and for the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be allocated pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e).

(b) The amount allocated for the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter pursuant to Section 96 or 96.1 or their predecessor sections, and Section 96.5 or its predecessor section to a special district, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 2201) of Chapter 3 of Part 4, including that portion of any multicounty district located within the County of Sacramento, and the amount allocated pursuant to Section 75.70 to a special district which is governed by the Board of Supervisors of Sacramento County or whose governing body is the same as the Board of Supervisors of Sacramento County, shall be governed by this section.

(c) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, the amount of property tax revenue that would otherwise be allocated to the special districts described in subdivision (b) pursuant to Section 75.70, or Section 96 or 96.1 or their predecessor sections, and Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, shall be reduced or otherwise adjusted by the difference between the following amounts:

(1) The reduction, if any, made to the amount of property tax revenues allocated to each special district pursuant to former Section 98.6 in the 1990–91 fiscal year as determined by the Sacramento County Auditor.

(2) The allocations approved by the Board of Supervisors of Sacramento County to each special district pursuant to former Section 98.6 in the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1992–93 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Sacramento County Auditor shall allocate to the special districts described in subdivision (b) the total amount of property tax revenue allocated in the prior fiscal year as calculated in subdivisions (c) and (e).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 96 or its predecessor section, for the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the annual tax increment as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 96.1 or its predecessor section for the special districts described in subdivision (b) in each tax rate area shall be the sum of the following amounts:

(1) Each special district’s share of property tax revenues in each of the tax rate areas within their respective jurisdictions without regard to this subdivision.

(2) The ratio of the amount determined for each special district in subdivision (c) and the special district’s property tax revenue for the 1990–91 fiscal year, multiplied by the special district’s share of property tax revenues in each tax rate area for the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall not be operative in the 1993–94 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

100.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year, the apportionment of property tax revenues in the County of San Bernardino shall be modified as follows:

(a) The auditor shall apportion an amount of property tax revenues to the Victor Valley Economic Development Authority that is equal to the amount that would be allocated to that authority if the base year for the George Air Force Base Project Area was changed to the 1997–98 fiscal year for purposes of Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The auditor shall reduce the amount of property tax revenues apportioned to all other jurisdictions within the George Air Force Base Project Area on a pro rata basis in an amount equal to the amount apportioned under subdivision (a).

(c) On or before June 30, 2004, and on or before June 30 of each fifth year thereafter, the Victor Valley Economic Development Authority shall remit to the Controller an amount of money equal to the amount of the increased aid provided by the state to school entities as a result of this section, plus interest. The interest shall accrue until the payment is made. The rate of interest shall be the rate of interest on the bonds of the authority. If there are no bonds, the rate of interest shall be the rate of interest earned by the Pooled Money Investment Board. The Department of Finance shall determine the amount to be remitted, after consultation with the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 611, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

100.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided in subdivision (b), for the 2003–04 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following apply:

(1) The property tax assessed value of an electric generation facility that is assessed by the State Board of Equalization shall be allocated entirely to the county in which the facility is located, and shall be allocated to that tax rate area in the county in which the property is located.

(2) The tax rate applied to the assessed value allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the rate calculated pursuant to Section 93.

(3) The revenues derived from the application of the tax rate to the assessed value allocated to a tax rate area pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated among the jurisdictions in that tax rate area, in those same percentage shares that property tax revenues derived from locally assessed property are allocated to those jurisdictions in that tax rate area, subject to any allocation and payment of funds as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, and subject to any modifications or adjustments pursuant to Sections 99 and 99.2.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the assessed value or the revenues derived from that assessed value from either of the following:

(1) An electric generation facility that was constructed pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the California Public Utilities Commission to the company that presently owns the facility.

(2) An electric generation facility that is owned by a company that is a state assessee for reasons other than its ownership of the generation facility or its ownership of pipelines, flumes, canals, ditches, or aqueducts lying within two or more counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

100.95.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2007–08 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following apply:

(1) The property tax assessed value of qualified property that is owned by a public utility and that is assessed by the State Board of Equalization shall be allocated entirely to the county in which the qualified property is located.

(2) The tax rate applied to the assessed value allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the rate calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100.

(3) The county auditor shall allocate the
 property tax revenues derived from applying the tax rate described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 100 to the qualified property described in this section as follows:

(A) (i) School entities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95, shall be allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage the school entities received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the qualified property is located.

(ii) The county in which the qualified property is located shall be allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage the county received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the qualified property is located.

(iii) Special districts, other than an “enterprise
 special district” as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), shall be allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage that these special districts, other than enterprise special districts, received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the qualified property is located.

(B) The balance of these revenues remaining after the allocations made under subparagraph (A) shall be allocated as follows:

(i) Ninety percent shall be allocated as follows:

(I) If the qualified property is located in a city, to the city in which that property is located.

(II) If the qualified property is located in an unincorporated area of the county, to the county.

(ii) Ten percent shall be allocated as follows:

(I) If the qualified property is provided water services by a water district that otherwise receives a property tax revenue allocation under this chapter, to that water district. If the qualified property is provided water services by more than one water district that otherwise receives a property tax revenue allocation under this chapter, those districts shall each receive an equal share of this revenue.

(II) If the qualified property is provided water services by a city, to that city.

(III) If the qualified property is provided water services by a private water company or a water district that does not otherwise receive a property tax revenue allocation under this chapter:

(aa) If the qualified property is located in a city, to the city in which that property is located.

(ab) If the qualified property is located in an unincorporated area of the county, to the county.

(4) The county auditor shall allocate the property tax revenues derived from applying the tax rate described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 100 to the qualified property described in this section in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 100, except that school entities, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 95, shall be allocated an amount equivalent to the same percentage the school entities received in the prior fiscal year from the property tax revenues paid by the utility in the county in which the qualified property is located.

(5) In order to provide the allocations required by paragraphs (3) and (4), the county auditor shall make any necessary pro rata reductions in allocations of property taxes attributable to the qualified property to jurisdictions other than those receiving an allocation under paragraphs (3) and (4).

(b) (1) A special district that serves more than one county shall spend property tax revenues allocated under this section within the county that allocated the property tax revenues in or near communities impacted by the qualified property.

(2) All other special districts that receive property tax revenues under this section and that have qualified property located entirely or partially within their jurisdiction shall spend the property tax revenues in or near communities impacted by the qualified property.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Qualified property” means all plant and associated equipment, including substation facilities and fee-owned land and easements, placed in service by the public utility on or after January 1, 2007, and related to the following:

(A) Electrical substation facilities that meet either of the following conditions:

(i) The high-side voltage of the facility’s transformer is 50,000 volts or more.

(ii) The substation facilities are operated at 50,000 volts or more.

(B) Electric generation facilities that have a nameplate generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more.

(C) Electrical transmission line facilities of 200,000 volts or more.

(2) “Qualified property” does not include either of the following:

(A) Additions, modifications, reconductoring, or equivalent replacements to the plant and associated equipment made after the plant and associated equipment are placed in service.

(B) Property that is subject to subdivisions (k) and (l) of Section 100.

(3) (A) An “enterprise special district” means a special district, other than a special district described in subparagraph (B), that performs, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, an enterprise function.

(B) An “enterprise special district” does not include any of the following:

(i) A qualified special district, as defined in Section 97.34.

(ii) A district organized pursuant to the Local Health Care District Law set forth in Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) A transit district.

(4) A public utility shall provide to the State Board of Equalization a description of the qualified property that is subject to this section in the form prescribed by the board. The State Board of Equalization shall transmit to the auditor of each county in which qualified property is located the information necessary to identify that property and the corresponding
 assessed value data necessary to make the property tax revenue allocations required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   (AB 308)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

100.96.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2011–12 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The revenue from the property tax assessed on qualified property, which is owned by a public utility and assessed by the State Board of Equalization, shall be allocated in accordance with subdivision (b) entirely within the county in which the qualified property is located.

(2) The tax rate applied to the assessed value of qualified property shall be the rate calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100.

(b) The county auditor shall do
 both of the following with respect to the property tax revenues derived from applying the tax rate described in subdivision (b) of Section 100 to the qualified property:

(1) Allocate the property tax revenues derived from applying the tax rate described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 100 as follows:

(A) First, to the county in which the qualified property is located and to all of the school entities located in that county, the amount of property tax revenues that would have otherwise been allocated to the county and school entities or districts had this section not been enacted.

(B) Second, to the East Contra Costa Fire Protection District, an amount equal to 2 percent of the property tax revenues.

(C) Third, to the City of Oakley, the
 balance of the property tax revenues.

(2) Allocate the property tax revenues derived from applying the tax rate described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 100 as follows:

(A) First, to taxing jurisdictions in those tax rate areas in the county in which the qualified property is located, an amount equivalent to the State Board of Equalization’s assessed value of the qualified property for the year multiplied by any override rate adopted by the local agency for the year.

(B) Second, the balance to taxing jurisdictions in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 100.

(3) In order to make the allocations required by this subdivision, the county auditor shall make any necessary pro rata reductions in the allocations of property tax revenues
 attributable to the qualified property to jurisdictions other than those receiving an allocation under this subdivision.

(c) The City of Oakley shall reimburse the county auditor for the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the county auditor to administer this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) “Qualified property” means both of the following:

(A) All plant and associated equipment, including substation facilities and fee-owned land and easements, placed in service by a public utility in the City of Oakley on or after January 1, 2011, and related to the following:

(i) Electrical substation facilities that meet either of the following
 conditions:

(I) The high-side voltage of the facility’s transformer is 50,000 volts or more.

(II) The substation facilities are operated at 50,000 volts or more.

(ii) Electric generation facilities that have a nameplate generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more.

(iii) Electric transmission line facilities of 200,000 volts or more.

(B) Any additions, modifications, reconductoring, or equivalent replacements to the plant and associated equipment made after the plant and associated equipment are placed into service.

(2) A public utility shall provide to the State Board of Equalization a description of the qualified property in
 the form prescribed by the board so that a separate valuation can be determined. The State Board of Equalization shall transmit to the auditor of Contra Costa County the information necessary to identify the qualified property and the corresponding assessed value data necessary to make the property tax revenue allocations required by this section.

(e) (1) The City of Oakley shall develop one new housing unit for each 40 jobs created on real property within the area that was, on September 1, 2010, owned by the DuPont Corporation, commonly and formerly known as the DuPont Antioch Plant, and consisting of approximately 378 acres. This obligation shall commence upon placing the qualified property in service.

(2) All units newly developed pursuant to this section:

(A) Shall be affordable to, and
 occupied by, extremely low income persons, as defined in the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code).

(B) Shall comply with the requirements of the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), except as otherwise provided in this section.

(C) Shall be completed and occupied no later than 10 years after any number of units required pursuant to paragraph (1) is determined pursuant to paragraph (3).

(D) May be located anywhere within the City of Oakley.

(E) May be used to satisfy the City of Oakley’s regional housing needs allocation.

(3) The number
 of jobs created in the area specified in paragraph (1) shall be determined as follows:

(A) By January 1, 2014, and by January 1, each five years thereafter, the City of Oakley shall determine the number of jobs, full and part time, existing in the area described in paragraph (1). The City of Oakley shall use data from a state or federal agency in making the determination. The number of units required pursuant to this section shall be one-fortieth of the number of jobs calculated and shall be included in the City of Oakley’s first applicable implementation plan.

(B) For each subsequent implementation plan, the number of additional units shall be based on the increase, if any, in the number of jobs since the prior calculation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   (SB 536)   Effective October 9, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [101. - 198.1.]



  CHAPTER 1. Construction [101. - 136.]

101.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to permit double taxation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

“Property” includes all matters and things, real, personal, and mixed, capable of private ownership.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

“Real estate” or “real property” includes:

(a) The possession of, claim to, ownership of, or right to the possession of land.

(b) All mines, minerals, and quarries in the land, all standing timber whether or not belonging to the owner of the land, and all rights and privileges appertaining thereto.

(c) Improvements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

(a) “Improvements” includes both of the following:

(1) All buildings, structures, fixtures, and fences erected on or affixed to the land.

(2) All fruit, nut-bearing, or ornamental trees and vines, not of natural growth, and not exempt from taxation, except date palms under eight years of age.

(b) This section shall be in effect until the date Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 83) of Part 0.5 goes into effect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 88, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 364)   Effective September 9, 2020.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

(a) Except as provided in Section 83.5, “improvements” includes both of the following:

(1) All buildings, structures, fixtures, and fences erected on or affixed to the land.

(2) All fruit, nut-bearing, or ornamental trees and vines, not of natural growth, and not exempt from taxation, except date palms under eight years of age.

(b) This section shall go into effect on the date Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 83) goes into effect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 88.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (SB 364)   Effective September 9, 2020.   Section conditionally operative by it own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

(a) “Personal property” includes all property except real estate.

(b) This section shall be in effect until the date Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 83) of Part 0.5 goes into effect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 88, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 58, Sec. 5.   (SB 364)   Effective September 9, 2020.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

106.

(a) Except as provided in Section 83.5, “personal property” includes all property except real estate.

(b) This section shall go into effect on the date Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 83) of Part 0.5 goes into effect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 88.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 58, Sec. 6.   (SB 364)   Effective September 9, 2020.   Section conditionally operative by it own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

107.

“Possessory interests” means the following:

(a) Possession of, claim to, or right to the possession of land or improvements that is independent, durable, and exclusive of rights held by others in the property, except when coupled with ownership of the land or improvements in the same person. For the purposes of this subdivision:

(1) “Independent” means the ability to exercise authority and exert control over the management or operation of the property or improvements, separate and apart from the policies, statutes, ordinances, rules, and regulations of the public owner of the property or improvements. A possession or use is independent if the possession or operation of the property is sufficiently autonomous to constitute more than a mere agency.

(2) “Durable” means for a determinable period with a reasonable certainty that the use, possession, or claim with respect to the property or improvements will continue for that period.

(3) “Exclusive” means the enjoyment of a beneficial use of land or improvements, together with the ability to exclude from occupancy by means of legal process others who may interfere with that enjoyment. For purposes of this paragraph, “exclusive use” includes the following types of use in property:

(A) Sole occupancy or use of property or improvements.

(B) Use as a cotenant.

(C) Concurrent use by a person who has a primary or prevailing right to use property or improvements at any time.

(D) Concurrent uses by persons making qualitatively different uses of property or improvements.

(E) Concurrent use by persons engaged in similar uses that diminish the quantity or quality of the property or improvements.

(F) Concurrent use that does not diminish the quantity or quality of the property or improvements, if the number of those concurrent use grants is restricted.

A use of property or improvements that does not contain one of the elements in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, shall be rebuttably presumed to be a nonexclusive use.

(b) Taxable improvements on tax-exempt land.

Any possessory interest may, in the discretion of the county board of supervisors, be considered as sufficient security for the payment of any taxes levied thereon and may be placed on the secured roll.

Leasehold estates for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from beneath the surface of the earth, and other rights relating to these substances which constitute incorporeal hereditaments or profits a prendre, are sufficient security for the payment of taxes levied thereon. These estates and rights shall not be classified as possessory interests, but shall be placed on the secured roll.

If the tax on any possessory interest or leasehold estate for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances is unpaid when any installment of secured taxes become delinquent, the tax collector may use those collection procedures which are available for the collection of assessments on the unsecured roll.

If the tax on any possessory interest or leasehold estate for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances remains unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for taxes carried on the secured roll, the possessory interest tax together with any penalty and costs which may be accrued thereon while on the secured roll shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.   Effective July 17, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

107.1.

The full cash value of a possessory interest, when arising out of a lease of exempt property, is the excess, if any, of the value of the lease on the open market, as determined by the formula contained in the case of De Luz Homes, Inc. v. County of San Diego (1955), 45 Cal. 2d 546, over the present worth of the rentals under said lease for the unexpired term thereof.

A possessory interest taxable under the provisions of this section shall be assessed to the lessee on the same basis or percentage of valuation employed as to other tangible property on the same roll.

This section applies only to possessory interests created prior to the date on which the decision of the California Supreme Court in De Luz Homes, Inc. v. County of San Diego (1955), 45 Cal. 2d 546, became final. It does not, however, apply to any of such interests created prior to that date that thereafter have been, or may hereafter be, extended or renewed, irrespective of whether the renewal or extension is provided for in the instrument creating the interest.

This section does not apply to leasehold estates for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from beneath the surface of the earth, and other rights relating to such substances which constitute incorporeal hereditaments or profits a prendre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

107.2.

The full cash value of leasehold estates in exempt property for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from beneath the surface of the earth, and all other taxable rights to produce gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from exempt property (all of which rights are hereinafter in this section referred to as “such oil and gas interests”), is the value of such oil and gas interests exclusive of the value of any royalties or other rights to share in production from exempt property owned by any tax-exempt entity, whether receivable in money or property and whether measured by or based upon production or income or both.

This section applies to such oil and gas interests created prior to the date on which the decision in De Luz Homes, Inc. v. County of San Diego (1955) 45 Cal. 2d 546, became final. This section does not, however, apply to any of such oil and gas interests created prior to such date which have been after such date or are hereafter extended or renewed, unless such extension or renewal is pursuant to authority in a contract, lease, statute, regulation, city charter, ordinance, or other source, which authority permits no reduction of the rate of royalty or other right to share in production on grounds of an increase in the assessed valuation of such oil and gas interest. Moreover, this section does not apply to any of such oil and gas interests if the rate of royalties or other right to share in production has, prior to the effective date of this section, been reduced to adjust for the fact that certain assessors have valued such oil and gas interests without excluding the value of said royalties or other rights to share in production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1684.)
-------------------------------------------

107.3.

The full cash value of leasehold estates in exempt property for the production of gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from beneath the surface of the earth and all other taxable rights to produce gas, petroleum and other hydrocarbon substances from exempt property (all of which rights are hereinafter in this section referred to as “such oil and gas interests”), is the value of such oil and gas interests, exclusive of the value of any royalties or other rights to share in production from exempt property owned by any tax-exempt entity, whether receivable in money or property and whether measured by or based upon production or income or both.

This section applies to:

(a) Such oil and gas interests created prior to the date on which the decision in De Luz Homes, Inc. v. County of San Diego (1955) 45 Cal. 2d 546, became final to which Section 107.2 of this code does not apply because said interests were extended or renewed on or before July 26, 1963.

(b) Such oil and gas interests created on or after the date on which said decision become final and on or before July 26, 1963.

This section does not, however, apply to any of such oil and gas interests extended or renewed after July 26, 1963, unless such extension or renewal is pursuant to authority in a contract, lease, statute, regulation, city charter, ordinance or other source which authority permits no reduction of the rate of royalty or other right to share in production upon the ground of an increase in the assessed valuation of such oil and gas interest. Moreover, this section does not apply to any of such oil and gas interests if the rate of royalties or other right to share in production has, prior to the effective date of this section, been reduced to adjust for the fact that certain assessors have valued such oil and gas interests without excluding the value of said royalties or other rights to share in production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1684.)
-------------------------------------------

107.4.
